apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="le/ad__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ads</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ading</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ading</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ading</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="le/ave__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aves</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/ie__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ay</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ain</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lo/se__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sing</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sing</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sing</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ma/ke__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kes</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>king</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>king</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>king</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="me/et__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/elt__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elt</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elt</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elts</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elted</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elted</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olted</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elting</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elting</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elting</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  

    <e lm="lose the joke" a="eleka"><i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/><p><l><b/>the<b/>joke</l><r><g><b/>the<b/>joke</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="make big showing" a="eleka"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>big<b/>showing</l><r><g><b/>big<b/>showing</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="make little showing" a="eleka"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>little<b/>showing</l><r><g><b/>little<b/>showing</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="lose by" a="eleka"><i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>by</l><r><g><b/>by</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="make love" a="eleka"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>love</l><r><g><b/>love</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="make a frontal attack" a="eleka"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>a<b/>frontal<b/>attack</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>frontal<b/>attack</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="make a fresh start" a="eleka"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>a<b/>fresh<b/>start</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>fresh<b/>start</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="make drowsy" a="eleka"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>drowsy</l><r><g><b/>drowsy</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="make pleasant" a="eleka"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>pleasant</l><r><g><b/>pleasant</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lead"><i>le</i><par n="le/ad__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="leave"><i>le</i><par n="le/ave__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="make up"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="make money"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/>   <p> <l><b/>money</l><r><g><b/>money</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lose"><i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="make"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="make"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>a<b/>mistake</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>mistake</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="meet"><i>me</i><par n="me/et__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="make public"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>public</l><r><g><b/>public</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="make possible"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>possible</l><r><g><b/>possible</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="make impossible"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>impossible</l><r><g><b/>impossible</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="make history"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>history</l><r><g><b/>history</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lose out" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="make angry" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>angry</l><r><g><b/>angry</g></r></p></e>
   <e lm="make compatible" a="eleka"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>compatible</l><r><g><b/>compatible</g></r></p></e>
